California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) (1) If the regional resource development project determines, based on the assessment conducted pursuant to subdivision (b), that the consumer referred to the regional resource development project by the court cannot be safely served in a complex needs home, the department shall notify the court of that determination in writing and shall continue to work jointly with the regional center to identify or develop alternative services and supports and implement the alternative services and supports that are identified or developed.

(2) (A) If the regional resource development project, in consultation
 with the regional center, the consumer, and, when appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian, conservator, or authorized representative, determines that admission to a complex needs home is necessary due to an acute crisis and the director of the department or their designee has approved that admission, the regional center shall immediately pursue a court order for short-term admission and crisis stabilization pursuant to Section 6506.

(B) A determination that admission to a complex needs home is necessary due to an acute crisis shall not be made until the regional center completes a report that includes all of the community-based services and supports considered, including, but not limited to, a community crisis home certified pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 4698) of Chapter 6 of Division 4.5, a supported
 living arrangement pursuant to Section 4689, including rental subsidies described in subdivision (i) of that section, environmental accessibility adaptions or other home modifications, supplemental services and emergency and crisis intervention services described in subdivision (a) of Section 4648, whether rate adjustments are necessary to secure the services and supports considered, and the reasons those options will not meet the consumer’s needs.

(C) For purposes for the report described in subparagraph (B), a regional center shall not be required to consider out-of-state placements or mental health facilities, including institutions for mental disease, as described in Part 5 (commencing with Section 5900) of Division 5, that are ineligible for federal Medicaid funding.

(d) For purposes of this section, out-of-state placements or mental health facilities and other facilities, including institutions for mental disease, as described in Part 5 (commencing with Section 5900) of Division 5, for which federal Medicaid funding is not available, shall not be deemed to be supplemental services or emergency and crisis intervention services under subdivision (a) of Section 4648.

(e) An admission of an adolescent or adult with complex needs to a complex needs home due to an acute crisis shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) An initial court commitment pursuant to this section shall not exceed six months. As soon as possible following admission to a complex needs home, a comprehensive assessment shall be completed by the regional center
 in coordination with the regional resource development project and the complex needs service staff. The comprehensive assessment shall include an identification of the services and supports needed for crisis stabilization and the timeline for identifying or developing the services and supports needed to transition the consumer back to a non-crisis community setting. Upon completion of the assessment, the regional center shall submit a copy of the assessment to the committing court.

(2) Immediately following the assessment, and not later than 30 days following admission, the regional center and the complex needs home shall jointly convene an individual program plan meeting to determine the services and supports needed for crisis stabilization and to develop a plan to transition the consumer back to community living pursuant to Section 4418.3.
 The clients’ rights advocate for the regional center shall be notified of the consumer’s admission and the time, date, and place of the individual program plan meeting and may participate in the meeting unless the consumer objects on their own behalf.

(3) If transition back to the community is not expected to be achieved within 180 days of admission, an individual program plan meeting shall be held to discuss the status of the transition and to determine if the consumer is still in need of crisis stabilization. If crisis services continue to be necessary, the regional center shall submit to the department an updated transition plan and a request for an extension of the consumer’s stay at the complex needs home for a period not to exceed 180 days. A consumer may reside in a complex needs home for up to one year, after which the
 consumer shall transition into a community living arrangement pursuant to Section 4418.3.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), a consumer may continue to reside in a complex needs home for a period not to exceed 18 months if all of the following conditions are met:

(i) After an additional comprehensive assessment by the regional center, the department determines that the consumer requires continued placement in a complex needs home.

(ii) An individual program plan is developed that identifies the specific services and supports necessary for the consumer to transition back into the community and includes a timeline to obtain those supports and services.

(iii) The committing court has reviewed and, if appropriate, extended the commitment.

(B) The clients’ rights advocate for the regional center shall be notified of any proposed extension under subparagraph (A). The clients’ rights advocate shall also be notified of the time, date, and place of any individual program plan meeting to consider the extension and may participate in the meeting unless the consumer objects on their own behalf.

(5) Notwithstanding paragraph (4), the regional center may request, and the committing court may grant, an additional extension of a consumer’s commitment, not to exceed 90 days, if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The regional center has demonstrated significant
 progress towards implementing the individual program plan required by clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4).

(B) Extraordinary circumstances exist beyond the regional center’s control that prevent the regional center from obtaining the services and supports required by the consumer according to the timeline included in the individual program plan.

(6) A consumer who transitions into the community after admission to a complex needs home pursuant to this section shall be considered to have complex needs for purposes of Section 4640.6.

(f) Consumers with complex needs may participate in day, work, educational, and recreational programs when the individual program plan identifies it is appropriate
 and consistent with the individual’s treatment plan. The complex needs homes shall assist the consumer with transitioning back to their prior residence, or an alternative community-based residential setting, within the timeframe described in this section.

(g) (1) The department may execute leases, lease-purchases, or leases with the option to purchase for real property necessary for the establishment or maintenance of homes to serve as complex needs homes.

(2) A complex needs home shall not be established or maintained in an existing building on the grounds of a developmental center described in Section 7505 that, at any point prior to June 30, 2023, had been licensed as a skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, or general acute care hospital, or was
 otherwise used for the purpose of the treatment or residential placement of consumers.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Acute crisis” means a circumstance that necessitates the admission of a consumer to a complex needs home due to the existence of both of the following conditions:

(A) There is imminent risk for substantial harm to the consumer or others.

(B) Existing services and supports available to the consumer in the community, including supplemental services and emergency and crisis intervention services provided pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4648, are insufficient and a more specialized environment
 for crisis stabilization is required to meet the consumer’s needs.

(2) “Complex needs” means the concurrent dual diagnosis of an intellectual or developmental disability and a mental health disorder.

(3) “Complex needs home” means a property operated by the department and designated to provide Stabilization, Training, Assistance and Reintegration (STAR) services for complex needs.

(4) “Containment” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 59000 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(5) “Emergency intervention” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 59000 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(6) “Prone restraint” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 59000 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(7) “Physical restraint” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 59000 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(8) “Seclusion” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 59000 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a complex needs home shall not utilize any of the following interventions:

(1) A prone restraint.

(2) A physical restraint or containment procedure, unless the consumer presents an imminent risk of serious physical harm to themselves or others that cannot be prevented using a less restrictive technique. In no circumstance shall a complex needs home utilize an emergency intervention technique that obstructs a consumer’s respiratory airway or impairs the consumer’s breathing or respiratory capacity.

(3) Seclusion.

(4) The emergency interventions described in Section 85102 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(5) Psychotropic or behavior-modifying medications used to control behavior or to restrict the person’s freedom of movement if that medication is not a standard treatment for the person’s individualized
 medical or psychiatric condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 130.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4419.

Within the limits of available funds it is the intent of the Legislature that the department shall require all personnel working directly with patients to complete, within a reasonable time after the effective date of this section or after their appointments, whichever is later, or have completed, training with regard to the care and treatment of such patients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4420.

In order to assure an adequate number of qualified psychiatric technicians, psychiatrists, physicians and surgeons, psychologists, nurses, social workers, laboratory and other technicians, and ancillary workers, the department shall negotiate with any or all of the following: the University of California, the state colleges, the community colleges, private universities and colleges, and public and private hospitals, and arrange such affiliations or make such contracts for educational or training programs and awards training grants or stipends as may be necessary. Arrangements may be made in the hospitals and clinics operated by the department for the clinical experience essential to such educational and training programs, and positions in the department as interns and residents may be established.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

4421.

In order to assure an adequate number of qualified psychiatrists and psychologists with forensic skills, the State Department of Developmental Services shall plan with the University of California, private universities, and the California Postsecondary Education Commission, for the development of programs for the training of psychiatrists and psychologists with forensic skills.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4422.

The department may examine all public and private hospitals, boarding homes or other establishments whether or not licensed by the department, receiving or caring for developmentally disabled persons and may inquire into their methods of government, and the treatment of all patients thereof.

It may examine the condition of all buildings, grounds, or other property connected with such institutions, and may inquire into all matters relating to their management. For the purposes specified in this paragraph the department shall have free access to the grounds, buildings, and books and papers of any such institution, and every person connected therewith shall give such information and afford such facilities for examination or inquiry as the department requires.

Any evidence found of suspected licensing violations shall be reported immediately to the State Department of Health Services or the State Department of Social Services, whichever has jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 432.)
-------------------------------------------

4423.

In every place in which a developmentally disabled person may be involuntarily held, the persons confined therein shall be permitted access to and examination or inspection of copies of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4424.

The department shall adopt, for all hospitals, rules and regulations, books of record for all departments, blank forms for clinical records and other purposes, questions for examination of employees, and questions for examination, in all the different branches of medicine and surgery and especially in the subject of diseases affecting the brain and nervous system, of all officers and interns, for the special use of the hospital.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4425.

The department shall keep in its office a record showing the following facts concerning each patient in custody in the several institutions:

(a) Name, residence, sex, age, place of birth, occupation, and civil condition.

(b) The date of commitment, and the respective names and residences of

(1) The person who made the petition for commitment,

(2) The persons who signed the medical certificate, and

(3) The judge who made the order of commitment.

(c) The name of the institution in which he is confined, the date of his admission thereto, and whether he was brought from his home or from another institution. If he was brought from another institution, the record shall show also the name of that institution, by whom he was brought therefrom and his condition.

(d) If discharged, the date of discharge, to whose care he was committed, and whether recovered, improved, unimproved, or not in need of commitment.

(e) If transferred, for what cause the transfer was made, and to what institution.

(f) If dead, the date and cause of death.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4426.

The department may inquire into the manner in which a person with an intellectual disability who is subject to commitment, not confined in a state hospital, is cared for and maintained. If, in its judgment, the person is not properly and suitably cared for, the department may apply to a judge of the superior court for an order to commit him or her to a state hospital under the provisions of this code. This order shall not be made unless the judge finds, and certifies in the order, that the person is not properly or suitably cared for by his or her relatives, legal guardian, or conservator, or that it is dangerous to the public to allow him or her to be cared for and maintained by the relatives, legal guardian, or conservator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 457, Sec. 47.   (SB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4427.

When the department has reason to believe that any person held in custody as developmentally disabled is wrongfully deprived of his liberty, or is cruelly or negligently treated, or that inadequate provision is made for the skillful medical care, proper supervision, and safekeeping of any such person, it may ascertain the facts. It may issue compulsory process for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, and may exercise the powers conferred upon a referee in a superior court. It may make such orders for the care and treatment of such person as it deems proper.

Whenever the department undertakes an investigation into the general management and administration of any establishment or place of detention for the developmentally disabled, it may give notice of such investigation to the Attorney General, who shall appear personally or by deputy, to examine witnesses in attendance and to assist the department in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it in this code.

The department may at any time cause the patients of any county or city almshouse to be visited and examined, in order to ascertain if developmentally disabled persons are kept therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4427.5.

(a) (1) A developmental center or State Department of Developmental Services-operated facility shall immediately, but no later than within two hours of the developmental center or State Department of Developmental Services-operated facility observing, obtaining knowledge of, or suspecting abuse, report the following incidents involving a resident to the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city or county in which the developmental center or State Department of Developmental Services-operated facility is located, regardless of whether the Office of Protective Services has investigated the facts and circumstances relating to the incident:

(A) A death.

(B) A
 sexual assault, as defined in Section 15610.63.

(C) An assault with a deadly weapon, as described in Section 245 of the Penal Code, by a nonresident of the developmental center or State Department of Developmental Services-operated facility.

(D) An assault with force likely to produce great bodily injury, as described in Section 245 of the Penal Code.

(E) An injury to the genitals when the cause of the injury is undetermined.

(F) A broken bone when the cause of the break is undetermined.

(2) If the incident is reported to the law enforcement agency by telephone, a written report of the incident shall also be submitted to the agency, within two working days.

(3) The reporting requirements of this subdivision are in addition to, and do not substitute for, the reporting requirements of mandated reporters, and any other reporting and investigative duties of the developmental center or State Department of Developmental Services-operated facility and the department as required by law.

(4) This section does not prevent the developmental center or State Department of Developmental Services-operated facility from reporting any other criminal act constituting a danger to the health or safety of the residents of the developmental center or State Department of Developmental Services-operated facility to the local law enforcement agency.

(b) (1) The department shall report to the agency described in subdivision (i) of Section 4900 any of the following incidents
 involving a resident of a developmental center or State Department of Developmental Services-operated facility:

(A) Any unexpected or suspicious death, regardless of whether the cause is immediately known.

(B) Any allegation of sexual assault, as defined in Section 15610.63, in which the alleged perpetrator is an employee or contractor of a developmental center or State Department of Developmental Services-operated facility.

(C) Any report made to the local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the facility is located that involves physical abuse, as defined in Section 15610.63, in which a staff member is implicated.

(2) A report pursuant to this subdivision shall be made no later than the close of the first business day following the
 discovery of the reportable incident. The report shall include the unique identifier of the person involved, and the name, street address, and telephone number of the facility.

(c) The department shall do both of the following:

(1) Annually provide written information to every employee of a developmental center or State Department of Developmental Services-operated facility regarding all of the following:

(A) The statutory and departmental requirements for mandatory reporting of suspected or known abuse.

(B) The rights and protections afforded to individuals’ reporting of suspected or known abuse.

(C) The penalties for failure to report suspected or known abuse.

(D) The telephone numbers for reporting suspected or known abuse or neglect to designated investigators of the department and to local law enforcement agencies.

(2) On or before August 1, 2001, in consultation with employee organizations, advocates, consumers, and family members, develop a poster that encourages staff, residents, and visitors to report suspected or known abuse and provides information on how to make these reports.

(d) A failure to report an incident under subdivision (a) shall be deemed a class B violation as provided in Section 1424.6 of the Health and Safety Code if the incident occurs in a distinct part long-term health care facility. If the incident occurs in the general acute care hospital or acute psychiatric hospital portion of the developmental center, a failure to report the incident under
 subdivision (a) shall be subject to a civil penalty specified in Section 1280.4 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 18, Sec. 7.   (AB 107)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4427.7.

(a) Designated investigators of developmental centers shall request a sexual assault forensic medical examination for any resident of a developmental center who is a victim or reasonably suspected to be a victim of sexual assault, as defined in Section 15610.63, performed at an appropriate facility off the grounds of the developmental center in accordance with Sections 13823.5 to 13823.12, inclusive, of the Penal Code, which includes, but is not limited to, the requirement that the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the city or county in which the developmental center is located be notified by the person performing the sexual assault forensic medical examination and that consent is obtained as required by subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 13823.11 of the Penal Code.

(b) The sexual assault forensic medical examination described in subdivision (a) may be performed at a developmental center by an independent sexual assault forensic examiner designated to perform examinations of victims of sexual assault in the jurisdiction of the developmental center only if it is deemed safer for the victim and the developmental center’s examination facilities are equipped with forensic examination and evidence collection capability comparable to that of the designated community examination facility, as determined by the independent sexual assault forensic examiner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 724, Sec. 6.   (SB 651)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4428.

When complaint is made to the department regarding the officers or management of any hospital or institution for the developmentally disabled, or regarding the management of any person detained therein or regarding any person held in custody, the department may, before making an examination regarding such complaint, require it to be made in writing and sworn to before an officer authorized to administer oaths. On receipt of such a complaint, sworn to if so required, the department shall direct that a copy of the complaint be served on the authorities of the hospital or institution or the person against whom complaint is made, together with notice of the time and place of the investigation, as the department directs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4429.

(a) The department shall biennially report to the Legislature its acts and proceedings for the two years ending the June 30th last preceding, with such facts regarding the management of the institution for the developmentally disabled as it deems necessary for the information of the Legislature, including estimates of the amounts required for the use of such hospitals and the reasons therefor, and including annual reports for each state hospital.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 10.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4430.

(a) The department shall report to the Legislature the prospective needs for the care, custody, and treatment of developmentally disabled persons, together with its recommendations therefor. For the purpose of preventing overcrowding, it shall recommend such plans for the development of additional medical facilities as, in its judgment, will best meet the requirements of such persons.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 80, Sec. 11.   (SB 163)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4431.

Charges made by the department for the care and treatment of each patient in a facility maintained by the department shall not exceed the actual cost thereof as determined by the director in accordance with standard accounting practices. The director is not prohibited from including the amount of expenditures for capital outlay or the interest thereon, or both, in his determination of actual cost.

As used in this section, the terms “care” and “care and treatment” include care, treatment, support, maintenance, and other services rendered by the department to a patient in the state hospital or other facility maintained by or under the jurisdiction of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4432.

(a) The State Department of Developmental Services shall report proposed allocations for level-of-care staffing in state hospitals that serve persons with developmental disabilities that shall include the following:

(1) All assumptions underlying estimates of state hospital developmentally disabled population.

(2) A comparison of the actual and estimated population levels for the year to date. If the actual populations differ from the estimated population by 50 or more, the department shall include in its reports a description of the change and the fiscal impact. The department shall make this information available to the Legislature during the budget process, but no later than January 10 of each year and no later than the release of the May revision of the Governor’s proposed budget each year.

(b) The department shall provide the information required by subdivision (a) on the same dates as specified in subdivision (a) to the State Council on Developmental Disabilities created by Section 4520. The State Council on Developmental Disabilities shall provide the Legislature with review and comment on the information in a report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 713, Sec. 34.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

4433.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The State of California accepts its responsibility to ensure and uphold the rights of persons with developmental disabilities and an obligation to ensure that laws, regulations, and policies on the rights of persons with developmental disabilities are observed and protected.

(2) Persons with developmental disabilities are vulnerable to abuse, neglect, and deprivations of their rights.

(3) Clients’ rights advocacy services provided by the regional centers, the advocacy services currently
 provided by the department at the state developmental centers, and the services provided by the department’s Office of Human Rights may have conflicts of interest or the appearance of a conflict of interest.

(4) The services provided to individuals with developmental disabilities and their families are of such a special and unique nature that they cannot satisfactorily be provided by state agencies or regional centers and must be contracted out pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 19130 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) To avoid the potential for a conflict of interest or the appearance of a conflict of interest, beginning January 1, 1998, the department shall contract for clients’ rights advocacy services. The department shall solicit a single statewide contract with a nonprofit agency that results in at least three responsive bids that meet
 all of the criteria specified in paragraph (2) to perform the services specified in subdivision (d). If three responsive bids are not received, the department may rebid the contract on a regional basis, not to exceed three regional contracts and one contract for developmental centers and headquarters.

(2) Any contractor selected shall meet the following requirements:

(A) The contractor can demonstrate the capability to provide statewide advocacy services to individuals with developmental disabilities living in developmental centers and in the community.

(B) The contractor does not directly or indirectly provide services to individuals with developmental disabilities, except advocacy services.

(C) The contractor has knowledge of the service system,
 entitlements, and service rights of persons receiving services from regional centers and in state hospitals.

(D) The contractor can demonstrate the capability of coordinating services with the protection and advocacy agency specified in Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900).

(E) The contractor has not provided any services, except advocacy services, to, or been employed by, any regional center or the Association of Regional Center Agencies during the two-year period prior to the effective date of the contract.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the Legislature further finds and declares that because of a potential conflict of interest or the appearance of a conflict of interest, the goals and purposes of the regional center clients’ rights advocacy services, the state hospitals, and the services of the
 Office of Human Rights, cannot be accomplished through the utilization of persons selected pursuant to the regular civil service system, nor can the services be provided through the department’s contracts with regional centers. Accordingly, contracts into which the department enters pursuant to this section are permitted and authorized by paragraphs (3) and (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 19130 of the Government Code.

(d) The contractor shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide clients’ rights advocacy services to persons with developmental disabilities who are consumers of regional centers and to individuals who reside in the state developmental centers and hospitals, including ensuring the rights of persons with developmental disabilities, and assisting persons with developmental disabilities in pursuing administrative and legal remedies.

(2) Investigate and take action as appropriate and necessary to resolve complaints from or concerning persons with developmental disabilities residing in licensed health and community care facilities regarding abuse, and unreasonable denial, or punitive withholding, of rights guaranteed under this division.

(3) Provide consultation, technical assistance, supervision and training, and support services for clients’ rights advocates that were previously the responsibility of the Office of Human Rights.

(4) Coordinate the provision of clients’ rights advocacy services in consultation with the department, stakeholder organizations, and persons with developmental disabilities and their families representing California’s multicultural diversity.

(5) Provide at
 least two self-advocacy trainings for consumers and family members.

(e) In order to ensure that individuals with developmental disabilities have access to high quality advocacy services, the contractor shall establish a grievance procedure and shall advise persons receiving services under the contract of the availability of other advocacy services, including the services provided by the protection and advocacy agency specified in Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 4900).

(f) The department shall contract on a multiyear basis for a contract term of up to five years, subject to the annual appropriation of funds by the Legislature.

(g) This section shall not prohibit the department and the regional centers from advocating for the rights, including the right to generic services, of persons with developmental
 disabilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4433.5.

Notwithstanding Section 4433, the department may contract with the State Council on Developmental Disabilities for the purpose of providing clients’ rights advocacy services to individuals with developmental disabilities who reside in developmental centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 2.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4434.

(a) Notwithstanding preexisting rights to enforce the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)), it is the intent of the Legislature that the department ensure that the regional centers operate in compliance with federal and state law and regulation and provide services and supports to consumers in compliance with the principles and specifics of this division.

(b) The department shall take all necessary actions to support regional centers to successfully achieve compliance with this section and provide high quality services and supports to consumers and their families.

(c) The contract between the department
 and individual regional centers required by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Division 4.5 shall include a provision requiring each regional center to render services in accordance with applicable provisions of state laws and regulations. In the event that the department finds a regional center has violated this requirement, or whenever it appears that a regional center has engaged in, or is about to engage in, any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) or any regulation adopted thereunder, the department shall promptly take the appropriate steps necessary to ensure compliance with the law, including actions authorized under Section 4632 or 4635. The department, as the director deems appropriate, may pursue other legal or equitable remedies for enforcement of the obligations of regional centers including, but not limited to, seeking specific performance of the contract between the department and the regional center or otherwise act
 to enforce compliance with Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) or any regulation adopted thereunder.

(d) As part of its responsibility to monitor regional centers, the department shall collect and review printed materials issued by the regional centers, including, but not limited to, purchase of service policies and other policies, guidelines, or assessment tools utilized by regional centers when determining the service needs of a consumer, instructions and training materials for regional center staff, board meeting agendas and minutes, and general policy and notifications provided to all providers and consumers and families. Within a reasonable period of time, the department shall review new or amended purchase of service policies prior to implementation by the regional center to ensure compliance with statute and regulation. The department shall take appropriate and necessary steps to prevent regional centers from utilizing a policy
 or guideline that violates any provision of Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) or any regulation adopted thereunder. The department shall confirm that the purchase of service policies and other policies, guidelines, or assessment tools utilized by regional centers when determining the service needs of a consumer are available to the public, as required by paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 4629.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 28, Sec. 5.   (SB 81)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4435.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to advance regional center service provision that is person centered and more uniform, consistent, and equitable, while enhancing the experiences of individuals and families. It is the further intent of the Legislature that the department shall, consistent with these equity goals, have the authority under this division to oversee and monitor the manner in which regional centers provide services pursuant to the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)).

(b) Written directives issued by the department shall be consistent with the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act, and shall not interfere with the discretion of the individual program
 planning team to determine the needs and services appropriate for each person with a developmental disability who is entitled to services under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 192, Sec. 6.   (SB 138)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4435.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide more statewide uniformity and consistency and promote equity in the administrative practices and services of regional centers, consistent with the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)), as specified in this section.

(b) (1) No later than June 30, 2024, the department shall establish common data definitions that shall be used to promote service access and equity in all regional center services and programs. No later than January 1, 2025, regional centers shall start recording the race and ethnicity and preferred language identified by each individual, subject to paragraph (4), at the time of initial intake, assessment, and the
 individual program plan meeting following the individual’s 18th birthday. Individuals have the right to update their demographic information at any time.

(2) The categories for race and ethnicity shall be based on the latest categories adopted by the United States Core Data for Interoperability set forth by the United States Office of the National Coordinator for Health Information Technology.

(3) “Preferred language” means the language chosen by the applicant or individual, or, when appropriate, the individual’s parent, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative.

(4) This section does not compel